North Carolina statutes. Chapter 8. Evidence.
Article 13. Photographs.

§ 8-97.
Photographs as substantive or illustrative evidence.

Any party may introduce a photograph, video tape, motion picture, X-ray or other photographic representation as substantive evidence upon laying a proper foundation and meeting other applicable evidentiary requirements. This section does not prohibit a party from introducing a photograph or other pictorial representation solely for the purpose of illustrating the testimony of a witness.

History.

1981, c. 451, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to admissibility of the contents of writings, recordings and photographs, see

G.S. 8C-1

, Rule 1001 et seq.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1981 law on evidence, see 60 N.C.L. Rev. 1359 (1982).

For survey of 1982 law on evidence, see 61 N.C.L. Rev. 1126 (1983).

§§ 8-98 through 8-102.

Reserved for future codification purposes.